Florida, session 2026, SB1030.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 14 15 Section 1.âSubsections (5), (6), and (7) of section 16 397.407, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 17 397.407âLicensure process; fees.â 18 (5)âExcept as provided in paragraph (6)(b), the department 19 shall conduct background screening, as provided in s. 397.4073, 20 as part of the licensure application for all owners, directors, 21 chief financial officers, and clinical supervisors of a service 22 provider. If the results of the background screening indicate 23 that the individual has been found guilty of, regardless of 24 adjudication, or has entered a plea of nolo contendere or guilty 25 to any offense prohibited under the screening standard, a 26 license may not be issued to the applicant service provider 27 unless an exemption from disqualification has been granted by 28 the department as set forth in chapter 435. The individual has 29 90 days within which to obtain the required exemption, during 30 which time the applicantâs license remains in effect. 31 (6)(a)âThe department may issue probationary, regular, and 32 interim licenses. The department may issue one license for all 33 service components operated by a service provider and defined 34 pursuant to s. 397.311(27). The license is valid only for the 35 specific service components listed for each specific location 36 identified on the license. The licensed service provider must 37 shall apply for the addition of any service components and 38 obtain approval before initiating additional services. The 39 licensed service provider must notify the department and provide 40 any required documentation at least 30 days before the 41 relocation of any of its service sites. Provision of service 42 components or delivery of services at a location not identified 43 on the license may be considered an unlicensed operation that 44 authorizes the department to seek an injunction against 45 operation as provided in s. 397.401, in addition to other 46 sanctions authorized by s. 397.415. Probationary and regular 47 licenses may be issued only after all required information has 48 been submitted. A license may not be transferred. As used in 49 this subsection, the term âtransferâ means includes, but is not 50 limited to, the transfer of a majority of the ownership interest 51 in the licensed entity or transfer of responsibilities under the 52 license to another entity by contractual arrangement. 53 (b)âIf 5 percent or more of the controlling ownership 54 interest of a licensed entity is transferred to another person 55 or entity, the department must require only a level 2 background 56 screening pursuant to s. 397.4073 for officers, directors, 57 managing members, and individuals who exercise operational 58 control over the licensee on behalf of that person or entity. 59 (7)(a)âUpon receipt of a complete application, payment of 60 applicable fees, and a demonstration of substantial compliance 61 with all applicable statutory and regulatory requirements, the 62 department may issue a probationary license to a service 63 provider applicant with services that are not yet fully 64 operational. The department may not issue a probationary license 65 when doing so would place the health, safety, or welfare of 66 individuals at risk. Notwithstanding paragraph (b), a 67 probationary license expires 90 days after issuance and may not 68 be reissued. During the probationary period the department shall 69 monitor the delivery of services. Notwithstanding s. 120.60(5), 70 the department may order a probationary licensee to cease and 71 desist operations at any time it is found to be substantially 72 out of compliance with licensure standards. This cease-and 73 desist order is exempt from the requirements of s. 120.60(6). 74 (b)âThe department may not require an existing licensed 75 service provider that is seeking to add one or more additional 76 levels of care at an existing licensed location, or that is 77 seeking to offer the same level of care at one or more of the 78 service providerâs new locations that are currently licensed, to 79 admit individuals for services during the probationary licensing 80 period if the provider has no outstanding violations pursuant to 81 s. 397.411(7) and the department has not taken any action 82 against the providerâs existing license pursuant to s. 397.415 83 within the previous 12 months. 84 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.